Hawaii, session 2026, HB1012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 189, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022 (Act 189), required the office of planning and sustainable development to conduct a study of the suitability of the land study bureau soil overall (master) productivity rating system (land study bureau soil rating system) and other soil classification systems used to regulate agricultural lands in the State.  Accurate soil data reflecting soil characteristics, soil properties, and identification of limits, risks, and soil suitability for various uses helps optimize public and private investments in agriculture to meet the State's food and agricultural sustainability goals. The legislature further finds that one of the findings of the Act 189 study is that the soil data used in the land study bureau soil rating system have not been updated since the land study bureau soil rating system was originally created in the 1960s and 1970s, and there is no process to regularly incorporate new soil data.  This undermines the credibility of the land study bureau soil ratings used to guide the regulation of agricultural lands. The legislature further finds that there is a need to update the soil data used by the land study bureau soil rating system, and establish a process for regularly updating the soil data to provide public assurance on the integrity of the land study bureau soil rating system. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Update the soil data used by the land study bureau soil rating system with current data and approaches; and (2)  Appropriate funds. SECTION 2.  (a)  The office of planning and sustainable development shall update the soil data used by the land study bureau soil rating system by incorporating the latest United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service's soil data for the State and soil data from other soil rating systems used in the State, developing a process for regularly incorporating United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service soil data updates for the State, creating detailed digital maps that show the soils across the State, and drafting statutory and ordinance changes that may be necessary to align State and county governance with the updated soil data used by the land study bureau soil rating system.  The office may procure consultant services to update the soil data used by the land study bureau soil rating system. (b)  The office of planning and sustainable development shall collaborate with the United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service and the American Farmland Trust to ensure that the land study bureau soil rating system aligns with national standards and best practices. (c)  The office of planning and sustainable development shall establish a public process for reviewing and refining the updated soil data in the land study bureau soil rating system and draft maps. (d)  The office of planning and sustainable development shall present the final land study bureau soil rating system that incorporates the updated soil data and maps to the legislature within twenty-four months of the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3. In conducting the work required by this Act, the office of planning and sustainable development shall request, as appropriate, the assistance of the department of land and natural resources, the department of agriculture, the college of tropical agriculture and human resources of the university of Hawaii, the land use commission, and the county planning and permitting agencies, which shall cooperate with the office. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $400,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the office of planning and sustainable development to conduct the work required by this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of planning and sustainable development for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST